Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1057.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 202. (1) The department shall establish a procedure that allows an individual to obtain a preliminary determination from the department concerning whether any court judgments against him or her the individual would likely result in a denial of a license or registration for failing to meet the good moral character requirement for that license. or registration. (2) All of the following apply for purposes of subsection (1): (a) To obtain a preliminary determination under this section, an individual must file a request that meets all of the following: (i) Is submitted on a form provided by the department. (ii) Identifies the license or registration for which he or she the individual may apply. (iii) Includes a detailed description of any criminal proceedings that resulted in a judgment against him or her.the individual. (iv) Includes the nonrefundable fee required by the department. (b) The department shall only consider the information provided by an individual under subdivision (a)(ii) and (iii) in making a preliminary determination. An individual may include a statement with the request describing additional information for consideration by the department, including, but not limited to, information described in section 2(4) of 1974 PA 381, MCL 338.42. (c) A preliminary determination under this section that is adverse to an individual does not prevent the individual from subsequently applying for a license. or registration. (d) The department or a board is not bound by a preliminary determination under this section that is not adverse to an individual if the individual applies for a license or registration under this act unless, at the time a full application for a license is submitted, the applicant has subsequently been convicted of a felony or has a previously undisclosed criminal conviction. (e) The issuance of a preliminary determination under this section does not limit the authority of the department to review applications for a license or registration, or to issue or deny a license or registration. (e) (f) The department shall notify an individual of a preliminary determination by delivering a preliminary determination letter to the individual, in a form determined by the department, not later than 60 days after the date a request for a preliminary determination was received. (3) An individual shall not request more than 1 preliminary determination under this section in any 120-day period. (4) The department shall not require an individual to complete any educational or training requirements before submitting a request for a preliminary determination. Sec. 203. (1) The department may issue a license to an individual under a specific article of this act if the individual demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department and a board, in the manner required under article 5, that the licensure requirements do not constitute a fair and adequate measure of the individual's knowledge and skills or that a required examination for receipt of a license does not serve as an adequate basis for determining whether an individual could perform an occupation with competence. (2) The department shall not issue and a person an individual shall not receive a license under this act until the person individual pays the appropriate fees established by rule promulgated by the department under section 207. (3) The department shall not deny a license to an individual under this act due to the individual's criminal history without first making a determination as to the individual's good moral character. (4) (3) The department may issue a license under this act with a limitation. If the department intends to impose a limitation on the issuance of a license of a person an individual under a specific article of this act, the department shall notify the appropriate board of its the department's intent, and the department may impose the limitation only with the approval of that board. However, if If a board, within not later than 60 days after it the board receives notification by the department under this subsection, does not approve or disapprove of the imposition of the limitation, the department may impose the limitation. A person that An individual who receives a license with a limitation may receive a review of the decision to place the limitation on the license under section 533. Sec. 217. The department shall prepare and publish an annual report describing the activities of the department and each board. The annual report shall be filed with the governor and the legislature. The department shall include within the report the following information concerning the preceding state fiscal year: (a) The number of applications denied by the department. (b) The number of applications denied by the department because of an applicant's lack of good moral character and a summary, by license and by category of offense, of the criminal convictions on which those denials were based.